Rhode Island statutes. Title 34 Property
Chapter 28 Mechanics’ Liens
34-28-19.
Costs of proceedings.

The costs of the proceedings shall in every instance be within the discretion of the court as between any of the parties. Costs shall include legal interest, costs of advertising, and all other reasonable expenses of proceeding with the enforcement of the action. The court, in its discretion, may also allow for the award of attorneys’ fees to the prevailing party.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 206, § 13; G.L. 1909, ch. 257, § 13; G.L. 1923, ch. 301, § 13; G.L. 1938, ch. 445, § 13; G.L. 1956, §

34-28-13

; G.L. 1956, §

34-28-19

; P.L. 1965, ch. 235, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 321, § 1.

34-28-20.
Persons entitled to contest claims.

Every defendant to any complaint and every person claiming to have a lien under §

34-28-1

,

34-28-2

or

34-28-3

on the property described therein or on any part thereof, and every person claiming an interest therein by title, claim, lease, mortgage, attachment, or other lien or encumbrance, may contest the right of the plaintiff and of all others claiming a lien under this chapter to the property or any part thereof to any lien, as well as the amount of the claim.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 206, § 15; G.L. 1909, ch. 257, § 15; G.L. 1923, ch. 301, § 15; G.L. 1938, ch. 445, § 15; G.L. 1956, §

34-28-15

; G.L. 1956, §

34-28-20

; P.L. 1965, ch. 235, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 630, § 1.

34-28-21.
Decree ordering sale.

The court shall, upon motion made by the plaintiff, defendant, or any other person, party to the proceedings, claiming to have a lien on the property or any part thereof under §

34-28-1

,

34-28-2

,

34-28-3

or

34-28-7

, had any claim against the property at the time of filing the complaint, or on becoming a party to the proceedings, the court shall, by itself or by a master to be appointed by it for that purpose, proceed to ascertain the exact nature and amount of each claim on the property or any part thereof, made by or belonging to any party to the proceedings, the amount of which to be allowed and paid shall be computed on the basis of the value of the property prior to the construction, erection, alteration, or reparation which is the subject matter of the complaint, and the order in which, in accordance with §

34-28-2

5, they should be paid, and, in the event no payment has been made into the registry of the court as provided in §

34-28-17

, how much of the property, and especially how much, if any, and what portions of land under and adjoining the same, subject to sale by the provisions of this chapter, should be sold to satisfy the claims; and thereupon the court shall decree the property or some part of it, or the interest of the person defendant in the property or some part of it at the time the lien accrued, to be sold by and under the direction of a master to be appointed for that purpose, with instructions, restrictions, and conditions as it shall give in the premises, and the master shall make the sale in accordance with the instructions, restrictions and conditions, free and clear of all titles, claims, leases, mortgages, attachments, or other liens or encumbrances (including all liens under §

34-28-1

, 34-28-2,

34-28-3

or

34-28-7

and all rights of dower and curtesy), except of persons who have rights which are excepted in §

34-28-16

from being void and wholly lost unless an appearance and account and demand or claim is filed in accordance therewith.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 206, § 16; G.L. 1909, ch. 257, § 16; G.L. 1923, ch. 301, § 16; G.L. 1938, ch. 445, § 16; G.L. 1956, §

34-28-16

; G.L. 1956, §

34-28-21

; P.L. 1965, ch. 235, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 328, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 630, § 1.

34-28-22.
Court instructions as to sale.

In every decree of sale the court shall prescribe the notice that shall be given of the sale, and shall also give therein instructions and particular directions as each case may require, and upon application to the court, at any time, further instructions and directions may be given from time to time in relation thereto.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 206, § 22; G.L. 1909, ch. 257, § 22; G.L. 1923, ch. 301, § 22; G.L. 1938, ch. 445, § 22; G.L. 1956, §

34-28-17

; G.L. 1956, §

34-28-22

; P.L. 1965, ch. 235, § 1.

34-28-23.
Application of proceeds of sale.

The proceeds of the sale, after payment of the master’s fees, costs and incidental charges as shall be allowed by the court, shall be applied by the master, according to his or her instructions from the court, to the payment of the claims as marshaled and ascertained, and the balance, if any, which shall remain after payment thereof, shall be paid over by the master to the owner or the lessee or tenant of the property, as the case may be.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 206, § 17; G.L. 1909, ch. 257, § 17; G.L. 1923, ch. 301, § 17; G.L. 1938, ch. 445, § 17; G.L. 1956, §

34-28-18

; G.L. 1956, §

34-28-23

; P.L. 1965, ch. 235, § 1.

34-28-24.
Master’s bond.

The court may, in its discretion, require of the master bond or bonds with surety or sureties in such sum and to the person or persons as it may direct, securing the faithful application of the proceeds of sale, and may from time to time remove the master on account of any noncompliance with its order or decree, and appoint a new master in his or her stead.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 206, § 18; G.L. 1909, ch. 257, § 18; G.L. 1923, ch. 301, § 18; G.L. 1938, ch. 445, § 18; G.L. 1956, §

34-28-19

; G.L. 1956, §

34-28-24

; P.L. 1965, ch. 235, § 1.

34-28-25.
Priority of liens.

The priority of liens under §§

34-28-1

,

34-28-2

,

34-28-3

and

34-28-7

shall be as follows:

Except as provided in subdivision (a)(3), as between persons having valid liens under this chapter, all of the lien holders shall share pro rata in the distribution of funds received by deposit under §

34-28-17

or of the proceeds of any sale under §

34-28-2

1, based on the amount of their claim plus their additional expenses of filing and advertising, if any.

Except as provided in subdivision (1), the priority of persons mailing and filing notices of intention under §

34-28-4

shall date from the date of the filing; the lien of the persons shall be senior to any subsequently recorded title, claim, lease, mortgage, attachment, or other lien or encumbrance (other than under §

34-28-1

, 34-28-2,

34-28-3

or

34-28-7

), and the lien of such persons shall be junior to any prior recorded title, claim, lease, mortgage, attachment, or other lien or encumbrance (other than under § 34-28-1, 34-28-2, 34-28-3 or 34-28-7). Any person having an existing lien under § 34-28-1, 34-28-2, 34-28-3 or 34-28-7 subject to any prior recorded mortgage, attachment, or other lien or encumbrance may pay off the prior mortgage, attachment, or other lien or encumbrance and shall be subrogated to all of the rights of the holder of the prior mortgage, attachment, or other lien or encumbrance.

In the event that there shall be recorded any title, claim, lease, mortgage, attachment, or other lien or encumbrance (other than under § 34-28-1, 34-28-2, 34-28-3 or 34-28-7) junior to any liens under § 34-28-1, 34-28-2, 34-28-3 or 34-28-7 in accordance with subdivision (2) and senior to other liens, then the liens under § 34-28-1, 34-28-2, 34-28-3 or 34-28-7 senior to the title, claim, lease, mortgage, attachment, or other lien or encumbrance shall be separated from the liens junior to the lien or encumbrance, and the senior liens shall be senior to the title, claim, lease, mortgage, attachment, or other lien or encumbrance, and the junior liens shall be junior thereto.

Priority between persons whose claims are not specifically provided for in this section shall be determined by the court or master in accordance with equity and good conscience.

History of Section.

P.L. 1965, ch. 235, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 328, § 1.

34-28-26.
Subordination or release of lien.

Any subordination agreement or release, bearing the signature of any person with authority to sign the agreement or release, or of the person who is designated in a notice of intention under §

34-28-4

as the person whose signature will bind the person filing the notice, which purports to subordinate or release any lien under §

34-28-1

,

34-28-2

,

34-28-3

or

34-28-7

whether for work done or materials furnished prior to the agreement or release, or thereafter, or both, notwithstanding the fact that no consideration is given therefor, shall be enforceable according to its terms, by any other person who has changed his or her position in any way in reliance upon the subordination agreement or release, whether the other person is otherwise obligated to make the change of position or not.

History of Section.

P.L. 1965, ch. 235, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 328, § 1.

34-28-27.
Direct payment on release of lien.

Any person entitled to any lien under §

34-28-1

,

34-28-2

or

34-28-3

who releases the lien before receiving payment for the work done or materials furnished forming the basis of the lien, shall be entitled to demand and receive direct payment therefor from the owner or lessee or tenant or other person as may be obligated or permitted to make the payment on behalf of the owner or lessee or tenant, provided that the person entitled to the lien first obtains the written consent of all persons in line of privity between him or her and the owner or other person; on presentation of a proper demand for the payment, the owner or lessee or tenant or other person shall, if satisfied as to the amount thereof, make payment, on proper receipt therefor, and credit shall be given therefor by all persons in line of privity between the owner or other person and the person releasing the lien.

History of Section.

P.L. 1965, ch. 235, § 1.

34-28-28.
Damages on withholding direct payment or consent thereto.

No person in the line of privity referred to in §

34-28-27

shall unreasonably withhold his or her written consent to a direct payment, nor shall any owner or lessee or tenant or other person referred to in §

34-28-27

unreasonably withhold a direct payment, and, if the person or owner or lessee or tenant or other person shall unreasonably withhold consent therefor or payment thereof, he or she shall be liable for any damages as may accrue as the natural and probable consequences thereof.

History of Section.

P.L. 1965, ch. 235, § 1.

34-28-29.
Form of demand for direct payment.

A demand for direct payment under §

34-28-27

shall be sufficient in substantially the following form:

DEMAND FOR DIRECT PAYMENT To: (here insert name of owner or lessee or tenant, or of other person as may be obligated or permitted to make payments on behalf of the owner or lessee or tenant). The undersigned hereby releases his or her lien against (here describe the building, canal, turnpike, railroad, or other improvement and the land on which it is situated, which description shall be sufficient to identify it generally with reasonable certainty) owned by or leased to (here insert name of owner or lessee) for work done or materials furnished by the undersigned, as follows: (Here insert a general description of the work done or materials furnished, with amounts and dates the work was performed). The undersigned had taken the following steps to perfect the lien: (Here insert the steps taken to perfect the lien under this chapter). The persons in line of privity between you and the undersigned are as follows: (Here insert names of all persons in line of privity). Each of the persons has endorsed his or her approval to this demand. Wherefore, the undersigned demands payment from you of the sum of (here insert amount). (Here insert signature and address of person making demand) Approved: (Here insert signatures of persons in line of privity) Payment received (For signature of person demanding payment, when he or she has received the same)

Click to view

History of Section.

P.L. 1965, ch. 235, § 1.

34-28-30.
Suit on bond to secure payment.

If any bond is given to secure payment for work done or materials furnished on account of the construction, erection, alteration, or reparation of any building, canal, turnpike, railroad, or other improvement or on account of any contract between the owner or lessee or tenant of the land on which the improvement is or shall be constructed, erected, altered, or repaired and any other person, the bond shall enure to the benefit of any person who does any work in the construction, erection, alteration, or reparation thereof, or who furnishes any materials used for that purpose, and the person doing the work or furnishing the materials may bring suit in his or her own name on the bond against any party thereto, notwithstanding the fact that no notice of intention under §

34-28-4

has been mailed or filed, and, further, notwithstanding the fact that he or she is not a party to the bond or to the contract between the owner or lessee or tenant and other person, and, further, notwithstanding the fact that he or she did not know of or rely on the bond or give any notice to the surety on the bond, and further, notwithstanding the fact that he or she did work or furnished materials for use on any subcontract, mediate or immediate, to such contract between the owner or lessee or tenant and the other person.

History of Section.

P.L. 1965, ch. 235, § 1.

34-28-31.
Application to governmental agencies.

No lien under §

34-28-1

,

34-28-2

or

34-28-3

shall attach to any building, canal, turnpike, railroad, or other improvement, if the improvement is being constructed, erected, altered, or repaired by or for the state, or any city or town, or any subdivision or agency thereof, or to any land upon which the improvement exists, if the land is owned by the state or any city or town, or any subdivision or agency thereof, but the provisions of §

34-28-30

shall apply to buildings, canals, turnpikes, railroads, or other improvements being so constructed, erected, altered, or repaired.

History of Section.

P.L. 1965, ch. 235, § 1.

34-28-32.
Contractor excused from completing work upon filing of complaint.

Whenever any such building, canal, turnpike, railroad, or other improvement shall be subject to sale under this chapter, from and after the filing of any complaint under §§

34-28-10

and

34-28-13

, any contractor who shall not have fully completed his or her contract in relation to the erection, construction, alteration, or reparation thereof, shall thereafter be excused from completing the contract, unless unreasonable conduct by the contractor has contributed materially to the facts giving rise to the filing of the complaint (in which case the person contracting with the contractor may at his or her option excuse the contractor), but the excuse from completing the contract shall terminate if and when the building, canal, turnpike, railroad, or other improvement and the land on which the improvement exists, shall be released and discharged under the provisions of §

34-28-17

, unless unreasonable conduct by the owner or lessee or tenant has contributed materially to the facts giving rise to the filing of the complaint.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 206, § 21; G.L. 1909, ch. 257, § 21; G.L. 1923, ch. 301, § 21; G.L. 1938, ch. 445, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

34-28-22

; G.L. 1956, §

34-28-32

; P.L. 1965, ch. 235, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 630, § 1.

34-28-32.2.
Construction.

This chapter is intended to afford a liberal remedy to all who have contributed labor, material, or equipment towards adding to the value of property to which the lien attaches and should be construed accordingly.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 328, § 3.

34-28-33.
Remedy of chapter not exclusive.

Except as otherwise specified, nothing in this chapter shall be construed to limit the right of any person, whether he or she have a valid lien hereunder or not, to remedies otherwise available to him or her under law; and the rights, if any, of any person who has filed his or her account and demand or claim under §

34-28-1

6 for any deficiency, or the rights, if any, of any person who has failed to file his or her account and demand or claim thereunder, against any other person (rather than against the property which is the subject matter of any complaint under this chapter) shall not be impaired by the provisions of this chapter. In the event that there is a conflict as to procedures between §

34-28-1

et seq. and the rules of civil procedure, then the procedures noted in § 34-28-1 et seq. shall prevail.

History of Section.

P.L. 1965, ch. 235, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 630, § 1.

34-28-34.
Definitions.

“Construction, erection, alteration or reparation” and “constructed, erected, altered or repaired,” as used in this chapter, means excavation and demolition preparatory to actual construction, erection, alteration, or reparation, except where used in the phrase “actual and visible commencement, by excavation or otherwise, of such construction, erection, alteration or reparation,” in §§

34-28-7

and

34-28-10

, which phrase shall be construed to include the excavation or otherwise, but not demolition.

“Mortgage” as used in this chapter means construction mortgages, so called, which are given to secure the payment of a sum certain which is to be advanced at stated times or intervals.

“Person” as used in this chapter means corporations, partnerships, or other organizations or entities, except that the words “individual person” means only a natural person.

History of Section.

P.L. 1965, ch. 235, § 1; P.L. 1966, ch. 197, § 5.

34-28-35.
Form of real estate description.

Whenever any description of real estate is required under the provisions of this chapter, it shall be deemed sufficient to describe the real estate by metes and bounds description and street address, or by recitation of the taxing authority’s assessor’s plat and lot designation and street address, or by recitation of the book and page of mortgage and street address.

History of Section.

P.L. 1965, ch. 235, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 630, § 3.

34-28-36.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Rhode Island Mechanics’ Lien Law.”

History of Section.

P.L. 1965, ch. 235, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 630, § 3.

34-28-37.
Severability.

If any part or parts of this chapter shall be held to be unconstitutional, that unconstitutionality shall not affect the validity of the remaining parts of this chapter. The general assembly hereby declares that it would have enacted the remaining parts of this chapter if it had known that the part or parts thereof would be declared unconstitutional.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 452, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 630, § 3.